Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-1120
Dentist; reciprocity; requirements.

Every applicant for a license to practice dentistry based on a license in another state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia shall meet the standards set by the board pursuant to section 38-126 and shall have been actively engaged in the practice of dentistry for at least one year under a license in another state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia. Practice in an accredited school or college of dentistry for the purpose of completing a postgraduate or residency program in dentistry also serves as active practice toward meeting this requirement.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 453;

Laws 2025, LB148, § 6.